Arkansas statutes. Title 25 State Government
Chapter 39

Government Efficiency and Accountability Act

25-39-101 — 25-39-303. [Repealed.]

25-40-101 — 25-40-105. [Repealed.]

25-41-101. Committee created — Members.

There is created a committee to be known as the “Daisy Gatson Bates Holiday Committee”.

The committee shall consist of nine (9) members:

Three (3) members of the general public who are residents of Arkansas and shall represent the state at large, to be appointed by the Governor;

Three (3) members shall be appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives, two (2) of whom shall represent and be residents of the First and Second Congressional Districts of Arkansas, respectively, and a third who shall represent the state at large; and

(1)Members shall serve for a term of three (3) years.

No member of the committee shall serve more than two (2) consecutive terms.

A vacancy in the membership shall be filled for the balance of the unexpired term in the same manner as the original appointment was made.

The Governor shall designate one (1) member appointed from the state at large as the chairperson of the committee.

A majority of the committee shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business.

(1)Members of the committee shall serve without compensation but, to the extent moneys are appropriated by the General Assembly, may receive expense reimbursement in accordance with §25-16-902 and may receive stipends in accordance with §25-16-903.

However, members of the committee shall not receive stipend payments under §25-16-903 for more than four (4) meetings in a twelve-month period.

History.

Acts 2007, No. 1583, §§ 1.

25-41-102. Duties.

The Daisy Gatson Bates Holiday Committee shall have the following duties:

To promote among the people of Arkansas, by appropriate activities, both awareness and appreciation of the civil rights movement and advocacy of the principles and legacy of Ms. Daisy Gatson Bates;

To promote principles of mentoring and leadership;

To promote racial harmony, understanding, respect, and goodwill among all citizens of Arkansas; and

The committee may receive donations and contributions from individuals and public and private organizations in order to carry out its responsibilities.

History.

Acts 2007, No. 1583, § 1.

25-41-103. Powers.

The Daisy Gatson Bates Holiday Committee may employ any staff and consultants if an appropriation is made for that purpose by the General Assembly and may fix the compensation, duties, authority, and responsibilities of the committee's employees.

History.

Acts 2007, No. 1583, § 1.